Hawaii statutes.
§657-9 Action barred in foreign
jurisdiction. When a cause of action has arisen in any foreign
jurisdiction, and by the laws thereof an action thereon cannot there be
maintained against a person, by reason of the lapse of time, an action thereon
shall not be maintained against the person in this State, except in favor of a
domiciled resident thereof, who has held the cause of action from the time it
accrued. [CC 1859, §1167; RL 1925, §2646; RL 1935, §3917; RL 1945, §10428; RL
1955, §241-8; HRS §657-9; gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Enforcement of valid and subsisting foreign judgment. 128 F.
Supp. 697 (1955).

Where, pursuant to Philippine case law, relevant Philippine
statutes of limitations were tolled as a matter of law, action was brought in
this State within the time required under the relevant Philippine statutes of
limitations as required by this section. 89 H. 91, 969 P.2d 1209 (1998).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next